Texas, session 892, HB48.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  DEFINITIONS. In this Act: (1)  "Department" means the Department of Public Safety of the State of Texas. (2)  "Division" means the Texas Division of Emergency Management. (3)  "Working group" means the alert notification system working group established by this Act. SECTION 2.  CREATION OF WORKING GROUP; COMPOSITION. (a) The alert notification system working group is established. (b)  The working group is composed of nine members appointed not later than December 31, 2025, by the chief of the division. SECTION 3.  DUTIES OF WORKING GROUP. (a) The working group shall study the statewide alert notification systems used to notify state residents of certain events, including the alert notification systems established by the department under Subchapters K-1, L, L-1, M, P, and Q, Chapter 411, Government Code, and any alert notification systems, and available data in the State of Texas Emergency Assistance Registry, operated by the division. (b)  The working group shall hold hearings and other work sessions to conduct the study required by Subsection (a) of this section. The study must include an evaluation of state and federal regulations regarding alert notification systems used by the department and the division and legislative recommendations to address the effects of notification fatigue on the effective operation of those systems and streamline the operation of those systems. (b-1)  The study required by Subsection (a) of this section must also include an evaluation of the effective operation of the alert notification systems described by Subsection (a) of this section with respect to certain populations, including persons who are hard of hearing, persons with chronic illness, and senior citizens. As needed, the working group may include legislative recommendations in the study on improving the effective operation of the alert notification systems for those populations. (c)  The working group may consult with the Federal Emergency Management Agency and any other federal or state agency for the purpose of collecting information necessary to conduct the study required by this section. SECTION 4.  REPORT AND LEGISLATIVE RECOMMENDATIONS. (a) Not later than December 1, 2026, the working group shall submit to the governor, the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and each other member of the legislature a report on the findings of the study required by this Act. (b)  The report must include recommendations for legislation to address the findings of the study. SECTION 5.  EXPIRATION. The working group is abolished and this Act expires January 1, 2027. SECTION 6.  EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.